src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON 370K1
 +Inf:%>å # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>år # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>åas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ått # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ått # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ådd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ådde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ådde # ;
 +Adj:%>åande # ;
 +Imp:%>å # ;

LEXICON 371
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>e # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>east # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ane # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ane # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 371K1
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>e # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>eas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ane # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ane # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 371K2
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>eas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ane # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ane # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 371KL
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>east # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ane # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ane # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 372
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>e # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>east # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ae # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ae # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aen # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ane # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ane # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 372A
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>e # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>east # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ae # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ae # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aen # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ane # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ane # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 372K1
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>e # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>eas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ae # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ae # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ane # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ane # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 372K2
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>eas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ae # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ae # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ane # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ane # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 372KL
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>east # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ae # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ae # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ane # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ane # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 373
 +Inf:%>dra # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>drar # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>dragast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>drog # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>dratt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>dratt # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>dratt # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>dratte # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>dratte # ;
 +Adj:%>dragande # ;
 +Imp:%>dra # ;

LEXICON 373K1
 +Inf:%>dra # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>drar # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>dragas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>drog # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>dratt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>dratt # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>dratt # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>dratte # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>dratte # ;
 +Adj:%>dragande # ;
 +Imp:%>dra # ;

LEXICON 374
 +Inf:%>dra # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>drar # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>dragast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>drog # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>dradd # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>dradd # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>dradd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>dradde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>dradde # ;
 +Adj:%>dragande # ;
 +Imp:%>dra # ;

LEXICON 374K1
 +Inf:%>dra # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>drar # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>dragas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>drog # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>dradd # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>dradd # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>dradd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>dradde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>dradde # ;
 +Adj:%>dragande # ;
 +Imp:%>dra # ;

LEXICON 375
 +Inf:%>å # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>år # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>åast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>egen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>egne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>egne # ;
 +Adj:%>åande # ;
 +Imp:%>å # ;

LEXICON 375K1
 +Inf:%>å # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>år # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>åas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>egen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>egne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>egne # ;
 +Adj:%>åande # ;
 +Imp:%>å # ;

LEXICON 375K2
 +Inf:%>å # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ær # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>åas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>egen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>egne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>egne # ;
 +Adj:%>åande # ;
 +Imp:%>å # ;

LEXICON 375KL
 +Inf:%>å # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ær # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>åast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>egen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>egne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>egne # ;
 +Adj:%>åande # ;
 +Imp:%>å # ;

LEXICON 376
 +Inf:%>å # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>år # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>åast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ege # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ege # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>egen # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>egne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>egne # ;
 +Adj:%>åande # ;
 +Imp:%>å # ;

LEXICON 376K1
 +Inf:%>å # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>år # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>åas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ege # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ege # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>egen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>egne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>egne # ;
 +Adj:%>åande # ;
 +Imp:%>å # ;

LEXICON 376K2
 +Inf:%>å # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ær # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>åas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ege # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ege # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>egen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>egne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>egne # ;
 +Adj:%>åande # ;
 +Imp:%>å # ;

LEXICON 376KL
 +Inf:%>å # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ær # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>åast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ege # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ege # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>egen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>egne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>egne # ;
 +Adj:%>åande # ;
 +Imp:%>å # ;

LEXICON 377
 +Inf:%>å # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>år # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>åast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ått # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ått # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ått # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>åtte # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>åtte # ;
 +Adj:%>åande # ;
 +Imp:%>å # ;

LEXICON 377K1
 +Inf:%>å # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>år # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>åas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ått # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ått # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ått # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>åtte # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>åtte # ;
 +Adj:%>åande # ;
 +Imp:%>å # ;

LEXICON 377K2
 +Inf:%>å # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ær # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>åas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ått # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ått # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ått # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>åtte # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>åtte # ;
 +Adj:%>åande # ;
 +Imp:%>å # ;

LEXICON 377KL
 +Inf:%>å # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ær # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>åast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ått # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ått # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ått # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>åtte # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>åtte # ;
 +Adj:%>åande # ;
 +Imp:%>å # ;

LEXICON 378
 +Inf:%>å # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>år # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>åast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ått # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ått # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ådd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ådde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ådde # ;
 +Adj:%>åande # ;
 +Imp:%>å # ;

LEXICON 378K1
 +Inf:%>å # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>år # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>åas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ått # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ått # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ådd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ådde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ådde # ;
 +Adj:%>åande # ;
 +Imp:%>å # ;

LEXICON 378K2
 +Inf:%>å # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ær # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>åas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ått # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ått # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ådd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ådde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ådde # ;
 +Adj:%>åande # ;
 +Imp:%>å # ;

LEXICON 378KL
 +Inf:%>å # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ær # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>åast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ått # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ått # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ådd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ådde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ådde # ;
 +Adj:%>åande # ;
 +Imp:%>å # ;
