src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
avslå+V:avsl 376 ; ! LEMMA_ID=4626
beslå+V:besl 376 ; ! LEMMA_ID=6557
dra+V:dr 374 ; ! LEMMA_ID=14863
fastslå+V:fastsl 377 ; ! LEMMA_ID=20139
fordra+V:fordr 374 ; ! LEMMA_ID=24114
føreslå+V:føresl 377 ; ! LEMMA_ID=24210
foreslå+V:foresl 376 ; ! LEMMA_ID=24211
forslå+V:forsl 377 ; ! LEMMA_ID=25031
helseslå+V:helsesl 377 ; ! LEMMA_ID=36433
hyvekse+V:hyv 372 ; ! LEMMA_ID=39251
jordslå+V:jordsl 377 ; ! LEMMA_ID=43525
kalkslå+V:kalksl 376 ; ! LEMMA_ID=44330
kjøpslå+V:kjøpsl 377 ; ! LEMMA_ID=46637
lamslå+V:lamsl 377 ; ! LEMMA_ID=53857
pantslå+V:pantsl 377 ; ! LEMMA_ID=68843
rådslå+V:rådsl 376 ; ! LEMMA_ID=76700
seigdra+V:seigdr 373 ; ! LEMMA_ID=78291
skadeslå+V:skadesl 377 ; ! LEMMA_ID=81161
skamslå+V:skamsl 377 ; ! LEMMA_ID=81313
slå+V:sl 377 ; ! LEMMA_ID=86032
svimeslå+V:svimesl 376 ; ! LEMMA_ID=92820
sylvslå+V:sylvsl 377 ; ! LEMMA_ID=93161
sølvslå+V:sølvsl 377 ; ! LEMMA_ID=93824
underslå+V:undersl 377 ; ! LEMMA_ID=104178
unnslå+V:unnsl 377 ; ! LEMMA_ID=104596
vekse+V:v 372 ; ! LEMMA_ID=108823
åreslå+V:åresl 376 ; ! LEMMA_ID=114655
bidra+V:bidr 374 ; ! LEMMA_ID=123355
unndra+V:unndr 373 ; ! LEMMA_ID=125680
anslå+V:ansl 377 ; ! LEMMA_ID=125687
kaldslå+V:kaldsl 378 ; ! LEMMA_ID=139744
